District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-206.08

Liability upon return of contribution.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 608, 34 DCR 6856
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720

Cross References

Partnerships, additional limited partners, assignment of a partnership interest, see § 33-207.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-468.